Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
TOBACCO-RELATED AND
TOBACCO-FOCUSED RESEARCH

23-20-201 to 23-20-208. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire part repealed, (HB 16-1408), ch. 153, p. 472, § 26, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added in 2000. For amendments to this part 2 prior to its repeal in 2016, consult the 2015 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.